Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,128.01
State Athletic Commissioner; salary increase; when effective.

Section 81-8,128 shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose to provide, in the public interest, adequate compensation as therein provided for the State Athletic Commissioner, and to permit a change in such salary as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 591, § 2, p. 2011.